src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-4lex_jotolah_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - jotolâh: # ok
    jotolâh+N+Sg+Nom: jotolâh
    jotolâh+N+Sg+Gen: jotoluv
    jotolâh+N+Sg+Acc: jotoluv
    jotolâh+N+Sg+Ill: jotolâhân
    jotolâh+N+Sg+Loc: [jotoluvâst, jotoluvvâst]
    jotolâh+N+Sg+Com: [jotoluvváin, jotoluváin]
    jotolâh+N+Sg+Abe: jotoluvttáá
    jotolâh+N+Ess: jotolâhhân
    jotolâh+N+Par: jotolâhhâd
    jotolâh+N+Pl+Nom: jotoluvah
    jotolâh+N+Pl+Gen: jotoluvâi
    jotolâh+N+Pl+Acc: jotoluvâid
    jotolâh+N+Pl+Ill: jotoluvváid
    jotolâh+N+Pl+Loc: jotoluvâin
    jotolâh+N+Pl+Com: [jotoluvâiguin, jotoluvâigijn]
    jotolâh+N+Pl+Abe: jotoluvâittáá

  Noun - siholdâh: # ok
    siholdâh+N+Sg+Nom: siholdâh
    siholdâh+N+Sg+Gen: siholduv
    siholdâh+N+Sg+Acc: siholduv
    siholdâh+N+Sg+Ill: siholdâhân
    siholdâh+N+Sg+Loc: [siholduvâst, siholduvvâst]
    siholdâh+N+Sg+Com: [siholduvváin, siholduváin]
    siholdâh+N+Sg+Abe: siholduvttáá
    siholdâh+N+Ess: siholdâhhân
    siholdâh+N+Par: siholdâhhâd
    siholdâh+N+Pl+Nom: siholduvah
    siholdâh+N+Pl+Gen: siholduvâi
    siholdâh+N+Pl+Acc: siholduvâid
    siholdâh+N+Pl+Ill: siholduvváid
    siholdâh+N+Pl+Loc: siholduvâin
    siholdâh+N+Pl+Com: [siholduvâiguin, siholduvâigijn]
    siholdâh+N+Pl+Abe: siholduvâittáá
    
  Noun - čácádâh: # ok
    čácádâh+N+Sg+Nom: čácádâh
    čácádâh+N+Sg+Gen: čácáduv
    čácádâh+N+Sg+Acc: čácáduv
    čácádâh+N+Sg+Ill: čácádâhân
    čácádâh+N+Sg+Loc: [čácáduvâst, čácáduvvâst]
    čácádâh+N+Sg+Com: [čácáduvváin, čácáduváin]
    čácádâh+N+Sg+Abe: čácáduvttáá
    čácádâh+N+Ess: čácádâhhân
    čácádâh+N+Par: čácádâhhâd
    čácádâh+N+Pl+Nom: čácáduvah
    čácádâh+N+Pl+Gen: čácáduvâi
    čácádâh+N+Pl+Acc: čácáduvâid
    čácádâh+N+Pl+Ill: čácáduvváid
    čácádâh+N+Pl+Loc: čácáduvâin
    čácádâh+N+Pl+Com: [čácáduvâiguin, čácáduvâigijn]
    čácádâh+N+Pl+Abe: čácáduvâittáá
